Washington statutes.
RCW 18.27.210

Violations—Investigations—Evidence.

(1) The director shall appoint compliance inspectors to investigate alleged or apparent violations of this chapter.

(a) The director, or authorized compliance inspector, upon presentation of appropriate credentials, may inspect and investigate jobsites at which a contractor had bid or presently is working to determine whether the contractor is registered in accordance with this chapter or the rules adopted under this chapter or whether there is a violation of this chapter.

(b) Upon request of the compliance inspector of the department, a contractor or an employee of the contractor shall provide information identifying the contractor.

(c) The director or the director's authorized representative may apply to a court of competent jurisdiction for a search warrant authorizing access to any jobsite at which a contractor is presently working. The court may, upon such an application, issue a search warrant for the purpose requested. The costs for obtaining the search warrant must be added to the penalty for a violation of this chapter if such a violation becomes final.

(2) If the employee of an unregistered contractor is cited by a compliance inspector, that employee is cited as the agent of the employer-contractor, and issuance of the infraction to the employee is notice to the employer-contractor that the contractor is in violation of this chapter. An employee who is cited by a compliance inspector shall not be liable for any of the alleged violations contained in the citation unless the employee is also the contractor.

[ 2007 c 436 s 10; 1993 c 454 s 8; 1987 c 419 s 2; 1986 c 197 s 2; 1983 1st ex.s. c 2 s 2.]

NOTES:

Finding—1993 c 454: See note following RCW 18.27.010.

Effective date—1983 1st ex.s. c 2: See note following RCW 18.27.200.